Alaska, session 34, SB214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Alaska Energy Authority - Electrical 350,000 350,000 10 Emergencies Program (HD 1-40) 11 Alaska Energy Authority - Juneau 9,150,000 9,150,000 12 Cruise Ship Terminal Port 13 Electrification (HD 4) 14 Alaska Energy Authority - Ketchikan 9,150,000 9,150,000 15 Cruise Ship Terminal Port 16 Electrification (HD 1) 17 Alaska Energy Authority - Round 18 14,594,885 14,594,885 18 Renewable Energy Project Grants (AS 19 42.45.045) (HD 1-40) 20 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute - 6,000,000 6,000,000 21 Marketing Alaska Seafood in Domestic & 22 International Markets (HD 1-40) 23 Community Block Grants (HD 1-40) 6,315,000 65,000 6,250,000 24 Grants to Named Recipients (AS 25 37.05.316) 26 Alaska Library Network - SLED and 217,500 217,500 27 Resources for Literacy and Online 28 Learning Programs (HD 9-24) 29 Alaska Municipal League - Alaska 450,000 450,000 30 Federal Infrastructure Implementation 31 & Sustainability Initiative (HD 1-40) 01 Alaska Teamster - Employer Service 5,200,000 5,200,000 02 Training Trust - Construction Driver 03 and CDL Training Center (HD 27) 04 Alaska Travel Industry Association - 6,000,000 6,000,000 05 Tourism Marketing Activities in 06 National and International Markets (HD 07 1-40) 08 Fairbanks Pipeline Training Center - 4,000,000 4,000,000 09 Modernize and Expand Pipeline Training 10 Equipment (HD 31-35) 11 Kenai Peninsula Economic Development 1,680,000 1,680,000 12 District - Kenai Instructional Service 13 Center (HD 6-8) 14 USS Ted Stevens Commissioning 100,000 100,000 15 Committee - USS Ted Stevens 16 Commissioning Activities & Support (HD 17 1-40) 18 Grants to Municipalities (AS 19 37.05.315) 20 Anchorage - Port of Alaska Cargo 15,000,000 15,000,000 21 Terminal Replacement (HD 1-40) 22 Fairbanks North Star Borough - Arctic 500,000 500,000 23 Winter Games Planning and Support (HD 24 31-35) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Mt. Edgecumbe High School Student 5,210,000 5,210,000 29 Housing Upgrades (HD 1-40) 30 Mt. Edgecumbe High School Replacement 5,094,000 5,094,000 31 of Main Academic Building Exterior 01 Envelope (HD 1-40) 02 Mt. Edgecumbe High School Replacement 3,140,000 3,140,000 03 of Boys' Dorm and Main Girls' Dorm 04 Windows (HD 1-40) 05 Mt. Edgecumbe High School Dining Hall/ 10,206,000 10,206,000 06 Kitchen Renovation (HD 1-40) 07 Mt. Edgecumbe High School Dormitory 468,000 468,000 08 Furniture Replacement (HD 1-40) 09 Mt. Edgecumbe High School Mattress 50,000 50,000 10 Replacement (HD 1-40) 11 Mt. Edgecumbe High School Campus-Wide 125,000 125,000 12 Laundry Machine Replacement (HD 1-40) 13 Major Maintenance Grant Fund (AS 14 14.11.007) 15 Craig Elementary and Middle Schools 462,863 462,863 16 Rehabilitation (HD 2) 17 Sidney C Huntington Elementary and 5,000,000 5,000,000 18 High Schools Renovation (HD 36) 19 Sand Point K-12 Major Maintenance (HD 219,588 219,588 20 37) 21 Tri-Valley School Septic System 921,805 921,805 22 Upgrade (HD 30) 23 Blackwell K-12 School Renovation, 7,152,341 7,152,341 24 Anvik (HD 36) 25 East High School Safety Upgrades (HD 5,913,442 5,913,442 26 20) 27 Service High School Health and Safety 3,550,808 3,550,808 28 Improvements (HD 12) 29 North Pole High School Mechanical and 8,319,879 8,319,879 30 Electrical Upgrades (HD 33) 31 Lake & Peninsula Borough - Fire 3,251,557 3,251,557 01 Suppression System Upgrades, 4 Sites 02 (HD 37) 03 West Homer Elementary School North 231,894 231,894 04 Wall Improvement (HD 6) 05 Mears Middle School Heating Upgrades 373,994 373,994 06 (HD 15) 07 Schoenbar Middle School Drainage and 409,484 409,484 08 Gym Floor Replacement (HD 1) 09 Nenana School Boiler Replacement (HD 242,558 242,558 10 36) 11 Mears Middle School Roof Replacement 4,162,555 4,162,555 12 (HD 15) 13 Arctic Light Elementary School 5,117,211 5,117,211 14 Exterior Renovation (HD 32) 15 Herman Hutchens Elementary School 6,689,067 6,689,067 16 Exterior Renovation (HD 29) 17 Denali Borough - District-wide 1,324,861 1,324,861 18 Electrical Code Upgrades (HD 30) 19 Chevak K-12 School Campus Renovation 13,190,342 13,190,342 20 (HD 38) 21 Marshall K-12 School Emergency Tank 1,773,311 1,773,311 22 Farm Repair (HD 39) 23 Sand Point K-12 School Doors and 383,986 383,986 24 Locker Replacement (HD 37) 25 Bob R. McHenry District Office Energy 1,692,574 1,692,574 26 Upgrades (HD 37) 27 Petersburg Aquatic Center Sewer Line 541,546 541,546 28 Repair (HD 2) 29 Buckland K-12 School Boiler 271,440 271,440 30 Replacement (HD 40) 31 College Gate Elementary School Roof 3,369,212 3,369,212 01 Replacement (HD 20) 02 Petersburg High/Middle School Security 1,188,941 1,188,941 03 and Access Renovation (HD 2) 04 Campbell Elementary School Roof 3,346,942 3,346,942 05 Replacement (HD 13) 06 Barry Craig Stewart Kasaan and Whale 1,077,756 1,077,756 07 Pass Schools Renovation (HD 1) 08 Nuniwaarmiut K-12 School Renovation, 6,000,000 6,000,000 09 Mekoryuk (HD 38) 10 Hooper Bay Emergency Tank Farm Pad 4,911,070 4,911,070 11 Repair (HD 39) 12 Akula Elitnauvik K-12 School 7,153,586 7,153,586 13 Renovations, Kasigluk-Akula, 14 Supplemental (HD 38) 15 Haines High School Locker Room 864,954 864,954 16 Renovation (HD 3) 17 Tok K-12 School Partial Roof 612,052 612,052 18 Replacement (HD 36) 19 Haines High School Roof Replacement 623,006 623,006 20 (HD 3) 21 Tuluksak K-12 Fuel Tank Replacement 5,154,100 5,154,100 22 (HD 38) 23 School Construction Grant Fund (AS 24 14.11.005) 25 Stebbins K-12 School Replacement (HD 12,546,600 12,546,600 26 39) 27 Deering K-12 School Replacement (HD 6,000,000 6,000,000 28 40) 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 Village Safe Water and Wastewater 272,500,000 18,000,000 254,500,000 02 Infrastructure Projects (HD 1-40) 03 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 628,100 628,100 04 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants (HD 1-40) 05 Water Small System Assistance Grants 3,000,000 3,000,000 06 (HD 1-40) 07 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 9,457,000 9,457,000 08 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants - 09 Emerging Contaminants (HD 1-40) 10 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 4,177,800 4,177,800 11 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 12 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 7,224,600 7,224,600 13 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI 14 (HD 1-40) 15 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 1,273,000 1,273,000 16 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants - IIJA, 17 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 18 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 5,344,000 5,344,000 19 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 20 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 12,200,100 12,200,100 21 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI 22 (HD 1-40) 23 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 7,640,000 7,640,000 24 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants- IIJA, 25 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Alaska Marine Salmon Program (HD 1-40) 825,000 825,000 30 Gulf of Alaska Chinook Salmon (HD 1- 3,300,000 3,300,000 31 40) 01 Wildlife Management, Research and 6,000,000 6,000,000 02 Hunting Access (HD 1-40) 03 Sport Fish Recreational Boating and 3,000,000 3,000,000 04 Angler Access (HD 1-40) 05 Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund 6,800,000 6,800,000 06 (HD 1-40) 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Emergency Medical Services Match for 500,000 500,000 11 Code Blue Project (HD 1-40) 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 AVTEC - Program Expansion, Equipment 5,320,000 5,320,000 16 Modernization, and Facilities Upgrades 17 (HD 6-8) 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans Affairs * * * * * 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 Public Protection and Infrastructure 5,000,000 5,000,000 22 Support (HD 1-40) 23 Air National Guard Modernization and 1,750,000 1,750,000 24 Sustainment (HD 1-40) 25 State Homeland Security Grant Programs 26,765,900 26,765,900 26 (HD 1-40) 27 FY2027 DMVA Deferred Maintenance, 32,600,000 32,600,000 28 Replacement, and Renewal (HD 1-40) 29 National Guard Counterdrug Support (HD 200,000 200,000 30 1-40) 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 Forest Inventory Initiative - Susitna 1,850,000 1,850,000 04 and Tanana Valleys (HD 1-40) 05 Land Sales New Subdivision Development 600,000 600,000 06 (HD 1-40) 07 Statewide Parks Safety, Sanitation, 1,000,000 1,000,000 08 and Access Improvements (HD 1-40) 09 Land and Water Conservation Fund 4,800,000 1,900,000 2,900,000 10 (LWCF) Grant Program (HD 1-40) 11 Cooperative Water Resource Program 400,000 400,000 12 Pass-through to USGS for Stream 13 Gauging Projects (HD 1-40) 14 Cooperative Forestry and Fire Programs 12,000,000 12,000,000 15 (HD 1-40) 16 Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation 4,330,000 4,330,000 17 Federal Program (HD 1-40) 18 Permitting Modernization and Reform 4,522,900 4,522,900 19 (HD 1-40) 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Alaska State Troopers Ballistic 375,000 375,000 24 Protection (HD 1-40) 25 Aircraft Critical Engine Replacement 2,000,000 2,000,000 26 and Safety Upgrades (HD 1-40) 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 31 AHFC Rental Assistance for Persons 1,500,000 1,500,000 01 Displaced Due to Domestic Violence - 02 Empowering Choice Housing Program 03 (ECHP) (HD 1-40) 04 AHFC Rural Professional Housing (HD 1- 5,000,000 4,000,000 1,000,000 05 40) 06 AHFC Affordable Housing Development 15,000,000 15,000,000 07 Program (HD 1-40) 08 AHFC Senior Citizens Housing 3,000,000 3,000,000 09 Development Program (HD 1-40) 10 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 4,750,000 750,000 4,000,000 11 Federal HOME Grant (HD 1-40) 12 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 3,750,000 3,750,000 13 Capital Fund Program (HD 1-40) 14 AHFC Federal and Other Competitive 7,500,000 1,500,000 6,000,000 15 Grants (HD 1-40) 16 AHFC Competitive Grants for Public 1,350,000 350,000 1,000,000 17 Housing (HD 1-40) 18 AHFC Supplemental Housing Development 4,000,000 4,000,000 19 Program (HD 1-40) 20 AHFC Statewide Housing Development and 8,000,000 8,000,000 21 Access (HD 1-40) 22 AHFC Energy Programs Weatherization 5,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000 23 (HD 1-40) 24 AHFC Federal and Other Competitive 35,000,000 35,000,000 25 Grants - Alaska Sustainable Energy 26 Corporation (HD 1-40) 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Alaska Marine Highway System Vessel 27,500,000 27,500,000 31 Overhaul, Annual Certification and 01 Shoreside Facilities Rehabilitation 02 (HD 1-40) 03 Public Building Fund Deferred 6,000,000 6,000,000 04 Maintenance, Renovation, Repair and 05 Equipment (HD 1-40) 06 State Equipment Fleet Replacement (HD 39,000,000 39,000,000 07 1-40) 08 Winter Trail Grooming Grants (HD 1-40) 120,000 120,000 09 Federal Program Match 122,267,227 109,435,055 12,832,172 10 Federal-Aid Aviation State 25,327,267 11 Match (HD 1-40) 12 Federal-Aid Highway Project 1,000,000 13 Match Credits (HD 1-40) 14 Federal-Aid Highway Project 1,000,000 15 Title 23 Receipts (HD 1-40) 16 Federal-Aid Highway State 93,258,500 17 Match (HD 1-40) 18 Other Federal Program Match 1,681,460 19 (HD 1-40) 20 Statewide Federal Programs 64,677,800 64,677,800 21 Cooperative Reimbursable 15,000,000 22 Projects (HD 1-40) 23 Federal Transit 20,757,800 24 Administration Grants (HD 25 1-40) 26 Highway Safety Grants 10,920,000 27 Program (HD 1-40) 28 Commercial Vehicle 3,000,000 29 Enforcement Program (HD 1- 30 40) 31 Emergency Relief Funding 15,000,000 01 (HD 1-40) 02 Airport Improvement Program 311,438,386 311,438,386 03 AIAS: International 42,099,683 04 Airports Systems Overruns 05 and Other Projects (HD 9- 06 24) 07 AIAS: International Airport 6,891,455 08 System Preconstruction (HD 09 9-24) 10 Aviation System Plan Update 1,800,000 11 (FFY2027) (HD 1-40) 12 Bethel Taxiway, Apron, 23,375,062 13 Fencing Improvements, and 14 Service Road - Stage 1 (HD 15 38) 16 FIA: Advanced Project 245,009 17 Design and Planning (HD 31- 18 35) 19 FIA: Airfield Pavement 344,543 20 Reconstruction and 21 Maintenance (HD 31-35) 22 FIA: Annual Improvements 575,252 23 (HD 31-35) 24 FIA: Environmental (HD 31- 367,513 25 35) 26 FIA: Equipment (HD 31-35) 4,236,397 27 FIA: Facility Improvements, 367,513 28 Renovations, and Upgrades 29 (HD 31-35) 30 FIA: Information Technology 245,009 31 Improvements (HD 31-35) 01 FIA: Rehabilitate Terminal 6,093,750 02 Access Road (HD 31-35) 03 FIA: Terminal Bathroom 2,812,500 04 Update (HD 31-35) 05 Haines Repaving, Drainage, 6,000,000 06 and Lighting - Stage 2 (HD 07 3) 08 Homer Airport Master Plan 703,125 09 Update (HD 6) 10 King Cove Runway 18,277,029 11 Resurfacing (HD 37) 12 Klawock Master Plan Update 937,500 13 (HD 2) 14 Noatak Airport Relocation - 38,125,000 15 Stage 2 (HD 40) 16 Nunam Iqua Airport 11,250,000 17 Improvements - Stage 2 (HD 18 39) 19 Sand Point Airport Master 1,500,000 20 Plan (HD 37) 21 Sitka Airport Lighting 2,687,490 22 Vault and Beacon (HD 2) 23 Statewide Rural Airport 1,000,000 24 System Overruns and Other 25 Projects (HD 1-40) 26 Statewide Rural Airport 15,414,109 27 System Preconstruction (HD 28 1-40) 29 Statewide Rural Aviation 5,000,000 30 Don Young Alaska Aviation 31 Safety Initiative (HD 1-40) 01 Statewide Various Airports 18,255,500 02 Snow Removal, ADA, and 03 Safety Equipment 04 Acquisition (HD 1-40) 05 Statewide Various Rural 7,679,125 06 Airports Minor Surface 07 Improvements and 08 Obstruction Removal (HD 1- 09 40) 10 TSAIA: Advanced Project 1,837,565 11 Design and Planning (HD 9- 12 24) 13 TSAIA: Airfield Pavement 52,755,472 14 Reconstruction and 15 Maintenance (HD 9-24) 16 TSAIA: Annual Improvements 3,023,688 17 (HD 9-24) 18 TSAIA: Auxiliary Parking 2,500,000 19 Lot Expansion (HD 9-24) 20 TSAIA: Environmental 245,009 21 Projects (HD 9-24) 22 TSAIA: Equipment (HD 9-24) 5,195,559 23 TSAIA: Facility 3,275,053 24 Improvements, Renovations, 25 and Upgrades (HD 9-24) 26 TSAIA: Information 2,450,086 27 Technology Improvements (HD 28 9-24) 29 TSAIA: Lake Hood Master 2,000,000 30 Plan Update (HD 9-24) 31 TSAIA: Passenger Boarding 8,877,330 01 Bridges (HD 9-24) 02 Tununak Airport 12,996,060 03 Rehabilitation (HD 38) 04 Surface Transportation Program 1,080,922,621 1,080,922,621 05 AASHTO Technical Programs 300,000 06 Support (HD 1-40) 07 Active Transportation 17,456,233 08 Improvement Projects 09 [AMATS] (HD 9-24) 10 Active Transportation 5,003,350 11 Pavement Replacement 12 Projects [AMATS NMO00008] 13 (HD 9-24) 14 Air Quality Mobile Source 186,105 15 Modeling (HD 1-40) 16 Akutan Harbor Access Road 345,686 17 [CTP Award 2023] (HD 37) 18 Alaska Highway Milepost 2,335,000 19 1348 Robertson River Bridge 20 Replacement (HD 36) 21 Americans with Disabilities 5,458,200 22 Act Implementation and 23 Compliance (HD 1-40) 24 Avalanche Mitigation [Stage 1,637,460 25 1] (HD 1-40) 26 Big Lake Road 727,760 27 Rehabilitation [SOGR 2022]: 28 Milepost 3.6-9.1 (HD 30) 29 Bridge and Tunnel 4,662,212 30 Inventory, Inspection, 31 Monitoring, Preservation, 01 and Rehabilitation Program 02 (HD 1-40) 03 Bridge Management System 591,305 04 (HD 1-40) 05 Bridge Scour Monitoring and 2,181,920 06 Retrofit Program (HD 1-40) 07 Captain's Bay Road [CTP 222,876 08 Award 2023] (HD 37) 09 Chena Hot Springs Road 454,850 10 Milepost 6-13 11 Rehabilitation [SOGR 2022] 12 (HD 34) 13 Chiniak Highway Milepost 11,871,585 14 15-31 Rehabilitation 15 [Parent and Final 16 Construction] (HD 5) 17 Chiniak Highway Milepost 10,734,460 18 15-31 Rehabilitation [Stage 19 1] (HD 5) 20 Civil Rights Program (HD 1- 297,468 21 40) 22 Cold Bay Ferry Terminal 19,920,160 23 Reconstruction (HD 37) 24 Community-Driven Carbon 11,932,899 25 Reduction Projects [FAST] 26 (HD 31-35) 27 Community-Driven 1,267,172 28 Transportation Projects 29 [FAST] (HD 31-35) 30 Complete Streets 7,777,935 31 Improvement Projects 01 [AMATS] (HD 9-24) 02 Congestion Mitigation and 409,365 03 Air Quality Improvements: 04 [AMATS] (HD 9-24) 05 Copper River Recreational 1,032,510 06 Trail and Access 07 Improvements (O'Brien Creek 08 to Haley Creek) (HD 36) 09 Craig to Klawock Bike and 5,000,000 10 Pedestrian Path [Stage 1] 11 [TAP Award 2023] (HD 2) 12 Cultural Resource 432,413 13 Management (HD 1-40) 14 Culvert Repair and 1,455,520 15 Replacement (HD 1-40) 16 Dalton Highway Preservation 18,194,000 17 and Reliability Program (HD 18 1-40) 19 Data Modernization and 11,395,357 20 Innovation (HD 1-40) 21 Denali Park Pedestrian 272,910 22 Bridges and Trail [WFLHD] 23 (HD 30) 24 Elliott Highway Milepost 227,425 25 12-18 Rehabilitation (HD 26 36) 27 Fairview Loop Road 13,468,793 28 Rehabilitation and Pathway 29 [Stage 1] (HD 25-30) 30 Ferry Refurbishment (HD 1- 4,000,000 31 40) 01 Ferry Terminal 1,360,000 02 Rehabilitation (HD 1-40) 03 Fleet Condition Surveys (HD 320,000 04 1-40) 05 Franklin Street and Thane 1,364,550 06 Road Rehabilitation [SOGR 07 2018] (HD 4) 08 Front Street Resurfacing: 6,094,990 09 Greg Kruschek Avenue to 10 Bering Street [CTP Award 11 2019] (HD 39) 12 Glenn Highway Milepost 53- 1,307,600 13 56 Reconstruction and Moose 14 Creek Bridge Replacement 15 (HD 29) 16 Healy Area and School 1,640,429 17 Pedestrian Path [TAP Award 18 2023] (HD 30) 19 Healy to Antler Ridge 4,373,816 20 Separated Path [TAP Award 21 2023] (HD 30) 22 Highway Fuel Tax Evasion 296,153 23 (HD 1-40) 24 Highway Safety Improvement 73,763,201 25 Program (HD 1-40) 26 Highway Safety Improvement 13,770,390 27 Program AMATS Planning 28 Boundary (HD 9-24) 29 Highway Safety Improvement 17,282,000 30 Program FAST Planning 31 Boundary (HD 31-35) 01 Homer All-Ages and 2,790,000 02 Abilities Pedestrian 03 Pathway (HAPP) [TAP Award 04 2023] (HD 6) 05 Ice Roads, Seasonal Roads, 6,204,154 06 and Winter Trails Program 07 (HD 1-40) 08 Inner and Outer Springer 1,246,289 09 Loop Separated Pathway [TAP 10 Award 2023] (HD 25-30) 11 Inter-Island Ferry 3,334,631 12 Authority Ferry 13 Refurbishments (HD 1-4) 14 Kachemak Bay Drive Milepost 4,000,000 15 0-3.5 Reconstruction (HD 6) 16 Kake Ferry Terminal 400,000 17 Rehabilitation (HD 2) 18 Kalifornsky Beach Road 3,120,900 19 Drainage Improvements (HD 20 7) 21 Keku Road Resurfacing: Kake 272,910 22 to Seal Point [WFLHD] (HD 23 2) 24 Kenai Spur Highway Reroute 1,819,400 25 (HD 8) 26 Ketchikan Shipyard 207,500 27 Receiving Slab 28 Rehabilitation (HD 1) 29 Knik Goose Bay Road 36,388,000 30 Reconstruction: Centaur 31 Avenue to Settler's Bay 01 [Parent and Final 02 Construction] (HD 25-30) 03 Kodiak Short Trail Project 925,165 04 (HD 5) 05 MatSu Valley Planning for 13,407,522 06 Transportation (MVP) 07 Improvement Program FY2025- 08 2027 (HD 25-30) 09 Metropolitan Planning 1,139,291 10 Organization (MPO) 11 Planning: AMATS (HD 9-24) 12 Metropolitan Planning 152,454 13 Organization (MPO) 14 Planning: FAST (HD 31-35) 15 Montana Creek Bridge 1,773,915 16 Replacement [TAP Award 17 2023] (HD 3) 18 Motorized Pavement 23,333,805 19 Replacement Projects [AMATS 20 RDY00012] (HD 9-24) 21 Naknek to King Salmon Non- 4,866,895 22 Motorized Pathway [TAP 23 Award 2023] (HD 37) 24 Nome-Teller Highway 12,189,980 25 Milepost 7 Snake River 26 Bridge #324 Replacement (HD 27 39) 28 Other DOT&PF Projects in 90,999,915 29 the AMATS Planning Boundary 30 (HD 9-24) 31 Other DOT&PF Projects in 6,710,010 01 the FAST Planning Boundary 02 (HD 31-35) 03 Otmeloi Way Rehabilitation 7,732,450 04 [CTP Award 2019] (HD 5) 05 Palmer-Fishhook Separated 660,000 06 Pathway: Trunk Road to 07 Edgerton Parks Road [TAP 08 Award 2023] (HD 29) 09 Parks Highway Milepost 52- 934,000 10 57 Big Lake to Houston 11 Reconstruction (HD 30) 12 Parks Highway Milepost 57- 840,600 13 72 Rehabilitation: Houston 14 to Willow (HD 30) 15 Pavement and Bridge 136,940,336 16 Preservation Program (HD 1- 17 40) 18 Pavement and Bridge 35,705,725 19 Preservation Program AMATS 20 Planning Boundary (HD 9-24) 21 Recreational Trails Program 3,555,000 22 (HD 1-40) 23 Research and Technology 5,076,018 24 Transfer Program (HD 1-40) 25 Rezanof Drive 375,706 26 Rehabilitation Milepost 0- 27 3.9 (HD 5) 28 Richardson Highway Milepost 614,048 29 113 Realignment (HD 36) 30 Rock Slope Stabilization 9,589,658 31 Program (HD 1-40) 01 Rural Ports and Barge 4,624,304 02 Landings Program (HD 1-40) 03 Second Street 8,497,000 04 Reconstruction [CTP Award 05 2019] (HD 5) 06 Seismic Bridge Retrofit 646,135 07 Program (HD 1-40) 08 Seldon Road Extension 3,638,800 09 [Stage 1]: Wasilla-Fishhook 10 Road to Lucille Street [CTP 11 Award 2023] (HD 28) 12 Seward Highway Milepost 116,750,000 13 98.5 to 112 Bird Flats to 14 McHugh Creek [Stage 2] (HD 15 9) 16 Shoreside Facilities 192,000 17 Condition Surveys (HD 1-40) 18 Skagway Ferry Terminal 800,000 19 Modifications (HD 3) 20 Small Hydrologic 113,713 21 Investigations (HD 1-40) 22 South Tongass Highway and 181,940 23 Water Street Viaduct 24 Improvements [Stage 2] (HD 25 1) 26 South Tongass Highway and 186,800 27 Water Street Viaduct 28 Improvements [Stage 3] (HD 29 1) 30 Spruce Mill Promenade [TAP 561,740 31 Award 2023] (HD 1) 01 State-Owned Shipyard 684,750 02 Repairs (HD 1-40) 03 Statewide Improvement 272,910 04 Program (SIP) 05 Transportation Control 06 Measures (TCM) [AMATS] (HD 07 9-24) 08 Steese Highway Milepost 128 341,138 09 Crooked Creek Bridge 10 Replacement (HD 31-36) 11 Sterling Highway Milepost 3,314,500 12 157-169 Reconstruction 13 Anchor Point to Baycrest 14 Hill [Stage 1] (HD 6) 15 Sterling Highway Milepost 6,140,475 16 157-169 Rehabilitation 17 Anchor Point to Baycrest 18 Hill [Stage 2-Highway 19 Safety Improvement Program] 20 (HD 6) 21 Sterling Highway Milepost 135,125,028 22 45-60 [Stage 4] (HD 7) 23 Surface Transportation 10,878,551 24 Overruns and Other Projects 25 (HD 1-40) 26 Tok Cutoff Highway Milepost 8,396,660 27 0-8 Resurfacing [SOGR 2018] 28 (HD 36) 29 Tok Cutoff Milepost 8-22 727,760 30 Rehabilitation (HD 36) 31 Transportation Plans and 761,901 01 Studies [FAST] (HD 31-35) 02 Transportation Workforce 8,000,000 03 Development and Training 04 (HD 1-40) 05 U.S. Geological Survey 688,836 06 Flood Frequency and 07 Analysis (HD 1-40) 08 Vintage Boulevard and 6,176,863 09 Clinton Drive 10 Reconstruction [CTP Award 11 2023] (HD 3) 12 West Susitna Access Road 47,486,340 13 [Stage 2] (HD 25-30) 14 Whitshed Road and 13,487,089 15 Pedestrian Improvements 16 [CTP 2019] [Parent and 17 Final Construction] (HD 5) 18 Williamsport-Pile Bay Road 1,364,550 19 Intermodal Access 20 Improvements (HD 1-40) 21 Winter Trail Safety Program 750,503 22 (HD 1-40) 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 UAF Campus Transit Fleet Maintenance 6,824,500 1,384,500 5,440,000 27 Facility (HD 35) 28 University of Alaska - UAA Industrial 260,000 260,000 29 Cutting Systems and Electrical 30 Distribution Upgrades (HD 20) 31 University of Alaska - UAA Welding & 3,000,000 3,000,000 01 Non-Destructive Testing Renovation (HD 02 20) 03 Deferred Maintenance 04 University of Alaska Deferred 32,460,000 32,460,000 05 Maintenance (HD 1-40) 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Stratton Library Building Acquisition 2,000,000 2,000,000 10 (HD 2) 11 Deferred Maintenance (HD 1-40) 3,700,000 3,700,000 12 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 6,250,000 06 1003 General Fund Match 65,000 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 37,179,000 08 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & Export Authority Receipts 10,880,000 09 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 350,000 10 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 18,300,000 11 1209 Alaska Capstone Avionics Revolving Loan Fund 417,500 12 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 5,265,885 13 *** Total Agency Funding *** 78,707,385 14 Department of Education and Early Development 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 96,656,844 16 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response Fund 11,838,481 17 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 15,725,000 18 1197 Alaska Capital Income Fund 24,118,000 19 *** Total Agency Funding *** 148,338,325 20 Department of Environmental Conservation 21 1002 Federal Receipts 267,085,100 22 1003 General Fund Match 18,000,000 23 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 12,675,400 24 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 25,184,100 25 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 26 *** Total Agency Funding *** 323,444,600 27 Department of Fish and Game 28 1002 Federal Receipts 13,050,000 29 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 4,125,000 30 1024 Fish and Game Fund 2,750,000 31 *** Total Agency Funding *** 19,925,000 01 Department of Health 02 1003 General Fund Match 500,000 03 *** Total Agency Funding *** 500,000 04 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 05 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & Export Authority Receipts 5,320,000 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 5,320,000 07 Department of Military and Veterans Affairs 08 1002 Federal Receipts 66,315,900 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 66,315,900 10 Department of Natural Resources 11 1002 Federal Receipts 19,230,000 12 1003 General Fund Match 1,900,000 13 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 5,522,900 14 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 400,000 15 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 600,000 16 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,850,000 17 *** Total Agency Funding *** 29,502,900 18 Department of Public Safety 19 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 2,375,000 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 2,375,000 21 Department of Revenue 22 1002 Federal Receipts 63,250,000 23 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 5,500,000 24 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 25,100,000 25 *** Total Agency Funding *** 93,850,000 26 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 27 1002 Federal Receipts 1,403,328,652 28 1003 General Fund Match 107,435,055 29 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,000,000 30 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 31 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 51,610,477 01 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 27,500,000 02 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 10,000,000 03 1147 Public Building Fund 6,000,000 04 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 4,931,850 05 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,651,926,034 07 University of Alaska 08 1002 Federal Receipts 5,440,000 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 32,460,000 10 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts 1,384,500 11 1209 Alaska Capstone Avionics Revolving Loan Fund 3,260,000 12 *** Total Agency Funding *** 42,544,500 13 Judiciary 14 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 5,700,000 15 *** Total Agency Funding *** 5,700,000 16 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 2,468,449,644 17 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 127,900,055 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 178,495,844 07 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 40,825,000 08 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 347,220,899 09 Designated General 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 7,522,900 11 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts 1,384,500 12 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response Fund 11,838,481 13 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 27,500,000 14 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 600,000 15 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,850,000 16 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 350,000 17 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 18 1197 Alaska Capital Income Fund 24,118,000 19 1209 Alaska Capstone Avionics Revolving Loan Fund 3,677,500 20 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 5,265,885 21 *** Total Designated General *** 84,227,266 22 Other Non-Duplicated 23 1024 Fish and Game Fund 2,750,000 24 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 51,610,477 25 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & Export Authority Receipts 16,200,000 26 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 16,400,000 27 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 4,931,850 28 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 18,300,000 29 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 110,192,327 30 Federal Receipts 31 1002 Federal Receipts 1,843,949,652 01 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 1,843,949,652 02 Other Duplicated 03 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 04 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 12,675,400 05 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 25,184,100 06 1147 Public Building Fund 6,000,000 07 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 82,859,500 08 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Office of the Governor * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Elections Security Grant Under the 1,032,800 1,032,800 10 Help America Vote Act (HD 1-40) 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Aniak Backup Generator Installation 150,000 150,000 15 (HD 37) 16 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Office of the Governor 05 1185 Election Fund (Help America Vote Act) 1,032,800 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,032,800 07 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 08 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 150,000 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 150,000 10 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 1,182,800 11 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Other Non-Duplicated 05 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 150,000 06 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 150,000 07 Other Duplicated 08 1185 Election Fund (Help America Vote Act) 1,032,800 09 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 1,032,800 10 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 8 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. The 04 appropriations made in secs. 7 - 9 of this Act are contingent on the 2027 fiscal year-to-date 05 average price of Alaska North Slope crude oil being equal to or greater than $80 a barrel on 06 December 31, 2026. 07 Appropriation General Other 08 Allocations Items Funds Funds 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 Grants to Municipalities (AS 13 37.05.315) 14 Anchorage - Port of Alaska Cargo 10,000,000 10,000,000 15 Terminal Replacement (HD 1-40) 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Major Maintenance Grant Fund (AS 20 14.11.007) 21 Klawock School Gymnasium Roof 1,253,006 1,253,006 22 Replacement (HD 2) 23 Kasuun and Kincaid Elementary Schools 7,272,005 7,272,005 24 Roof Replacement (HD 9-24) 25 Tanana K-12 School Playground 453,738 453,738 26 Replacement (HD 36) 27 Denali Borough - Generator Replacement 1,422,183 1,422,183 28 for Two Schools (HD 30) 29 Stellar Secondary School Fire Alarm 252,912 252,912 30 (HD 14) 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 UAA Alaska Leaders Archives Consortium 1,250,000 1,250,000 04 Library Renovation - Phase I (HD 20) 05 UAS Sitka Campus New Dock and 2,000,000 2,000,000 06 Mariculture Training Facility - Phase 07 II (HD 2) 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 Court Security Projects (HD 1-40) 2,050,000 2,050,000 12 (SECTION 8 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 8. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 7 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 10,000,000 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 10,000,000 07 Department of Education and Early Development 08 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 10,653,844 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 10,653,844 10 University of Alaska 11 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 3,250,000 12 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,250,000 13 Judiciary 14 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 2,050,000 15 *** Total Agency Funding *** 2,050,000 16 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 25,953,844 17 (SECTION 9 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 9. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 7 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 25,953,844 06 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 25,953,844 07 (SECTION 10 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 10. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND 02 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be 03 $650,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 14, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 117, lines 19 - 20, 04 (Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy 05 Authority, electrical vehicle infrastructure plan - $1,500,000), is reappropriated to the 06 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy 07 Authority, for state match of federal receipts received for the United States Department of 08 Energy State Energy Program. 09 * Sec. 11. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. The amount 10 of federal receipts received during the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, 11 for creating a statewide project permitting dashboard is appropriated to the Department of 12 Natural Resources, administration and support services, for that purpose. 13 * Sec. 12. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. Federal receipts, designated 14 program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program receipts under 15 AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of 16 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the Alaska marine highway system fund 17 under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the vaccine assessment fund under AS 18.09.230, receipts 18 of the University of Alaska under AS 37.05.146(b)(2), receipts of the highways equipment 19 working capital fund under AS 44.68.210, and receipts of commercial fisheries test fishing 20 operations under AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 21 2027, and that exceed the amounts appropriated by this Act are appropriated conditioned on 22 compliance with the program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). Receipts received under 23 this section during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, do not include the balance of a state 24 fund on June 30, 2026. 25 * Sec. 13. INSURANCE CLAIMS. The amounts to be received in settlement of insurance 26 claims for losses and the amounts to be received as recovery for losses are appropriated from 27 the general fund to the 28 (1) state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)); or 29 (2) appropriate state agency to mitigate the loss. 30 * Sec. 14. NATIONAL PETROLEUM RESERVE - ALASKA IMPACT GRANT 31 PROGRAM. The amount received by the National Petroleum Reserve - Alaska special 01 revenue fund (AS 37.05.530(a)) under 42 U.S.C. 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 by 02 June 30, 2026, estimated to be $17,900,000, is appropriated from that fund to the Department 03 of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for capital project grants under the 04 National Petroleum Reserve - Alaska impact grant program. 05 * Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 06 DEVELOPMENT. (a) Federal receipts received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 07 for community development block grant disaster recovery programs are appropriated to the 08 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for that purpose. 09 (b) Federal receipts received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from tax 10 credits available from the federal government for renewable energy projects funded by the 11 Alaska Energy Authority, estimated to be $0, are appropriated to the Alaska Energy Authority 12 for renewable energy projects or matching funds for federal grants. 13 (c) The sum of $37,500,000 is appropriated from the commercial vessel passenger tax 14 account (AS 43.52.230) to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 15 Development for payment as grants under AS 37.05.315 to the following municipalities 16 affected by commercial passenger vessel operations for projects to repair, maintain, and 17 upgrade port facilities and harbor infrastructure, enhance passenger safety, and provide 18 services to vessels and passengers, in the following amounts: 19 MUNICIPALITY AMOUNT 20 Anchorage $1,575,000 21 Haines 3,000,000 22 Homer 125,000 23 Hoonah 3,000,000 24 Juneau 6,000,000 25 Ketchikan 6,875,000 26 Klawock 125,000 27 Kodiak 300,000 28 Petersburg 125,000 29 Seward 500,000 30 Sitka 4,500,000 31 Skagway 9,000,000 01 Unalaska 125,000 02 Valdez 375,000 03 Whittier 1,500,000 04 Wrangell 375,000. 05 (d) If, after all other appropriations from the commercial vessel passenger tax account 06 (AS 43.52.230) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, as passed by the Thirty-Fourth 07 Alaska State Legislature in the Second Regular Session and enacted into law, have been 08 made, the balance of the account is less than the amount necessary to pay the grants to 09 municipalities under (c) of this section, the appropriations made in (c) of this section shall be 10 reduced in proportion to the amount of the shortfall. 11 (e) Section 11(a), ch. 12, SLA 2025, is amended to read: 12 (a) The sum of $600,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the 13 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payments as 14 organization grants under AS 29.05.190 to the Xunaa Borough for the fiscal years 15 ending [JUNE 30, 2026,] June 30, 2027, [AND] June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 16 * Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. The 17 unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, estimated to be a total of $4,953,410, of 18 the following appropriations are reappropriated to the school construction grant fund 19 (AS 14.11.005) for payment as a grant by the Department of Education and Early 20 Development under AS 14.11.015 to the Bering Strait School District for the Stebbins K-12 21 school replacement: 22 (1) sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2018, page 4, lines 30 - 31 (Department of 23 Environmental Conservation, Flint Hills settlement, piped water system - $14,360,000), 24 estimated balance of $4,791,561; 25 (2) sec. 39(a)(1), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, Medicaid 26 management information system completion), estimated balance of $110,313; and 27 (3) sec. 39(a)(6), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, Medicaid 28 management information system completion), estimated balance of $51,536. 29 * Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND COMMUNITY SERVICES. The 30 unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be $272,000, of the appropriation made in 31 sec. 37(a)(25), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Family and Community Services, 01 replacement of the roof at the Palmer Alaska Veterans and Pioneers Home), is reappropriated 02 to the Department of Family and Community Services for Alaska Veterans' and Pioneers' 03 Home deferred maintenance needs. 04 * Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. (a) The proceeds received by the 05 Department of Fish and Game during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of 06 state-owned vessels and aircraft purchased without using federal funds, estimated to be 07 $150,000, are appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for renewal, replacement, and 08 maintenance of vessels and aircraft. 09 (b) The proceeds received by the Department of Fish and Game during the fiscal year 10 ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of state-owned equipment purchased by the Department 11 of Fish and Game for federal projects using federal funds, estimated to be $200,000, are 12 appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for renewal, replacement, and maintenance 13 of equipment to facilitate the same federal projects. 14 * Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. (a) The unexpended and unobligated balances of 15 the following appropriations, not to exceed a total of $7,125,675, are reappropriated to the 16 Department of Health for design, development, and implementation of a Medicaid service 17 authorization solution: 18 (1) sec. 39(a)(9), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, mental health: 19 deferred maintenance and accessibility improvements), estimated balance of $25,817; 20 (2) sec. 39(a)(11), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, electronic health 21 record incentive payments), not to exceed $4,886,865; 22 (3) sec. 39(a)(35), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, electronic visit 23 verification system implementation), estimated balance of $1,527,035; 24 (4) sec. 39(a)(40), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, mental health: 25 deferred maintenance and accessibility improvements), estimated balance of $15,000; 26 (5) sec. 39(a)(41), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, mental health: 27 essential program equipment), estimated balance of $18,510; 28 (6) sec. 39(a)(42), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, mental health: 29 home modification and upgrades to retain housing), estimated balance of $45,000; 30 (7) sec. 5, ch. 12, SLA 2022, page 15, lines 16 - 17 (Department of Health, 31 MH: essential program equipment - $600,000), estimated balance of $35,330; 01 (8) sec. 5, ch. 12, SLA 2022, page 15, lines 18 - 19 (Department of Health, 02 MH: home modification and upgrades to retain housing - $1,150,000), estimated balance of 03 $72,118; 04 (9) sec. 4, ch. 2, FSSLA 2023, page 11, lines 13 - 14 (Department of Health, 05 MH: deferred maintenance and accessibility improvements - $500,000), estimated balance of 06 $250,000; and 07 (10) sec. 5, ch. 9, SLA 2024, page 14, lines 10 - 11 (Department of Health, 08 MH trust: essential program equipment - $500,000), estimated balance of $250,000. 09 (b) The unexpended and unobligated federal receipt balance, after the appropriation 10 made in (a)(2) of this section, not to exceed $780,134, of the appropriation made in sec. 11 39(a)(11), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, electronic health record incentive 12 payments), is reappropriated to the Department of Health, division of senior and disabilities 13 services, for assessment capacity for individuals with disabilities and seniors for the fiscal 14 years ending June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 15 (c) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, estimated to be a total of 16 $211,335, of the following appropriations are reappropriated to the Department of Health, 17 division of senior and disabilities services, for assessment capacity for individuals with 18 disabilities and seniors for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, and June 30, 19 2029: 20 (1) sec. 39(a)(3), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, statewide 21 electronic health information exchange system), estimated balance of $16,270; 22 (2) sec. 39(a)(13), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, deferred 23 maintenance, renovation, repair, and equipment for facilities of the department), estimated 24 balance of $15,000; 25 (3) sec. 39(a)(17), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, mental health: 26 essential program equipment), estimated balance of $15,000; 27 (4) sec. 39(a)(23), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, mental health: 28 home modification and upgrades to retain housing), estimated balance of $5,498; and 29 (5) sec. 39(a)(30), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Health, senior and 30 disabilities services system upgrade), estimated balance of $159,567. 31 (d) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balance, not to exceed $850,000, of 01 the appropriation made in sec. 4, ch. 2, FSSLA 2023, page 11, lines 11 - 12 (Department of 02 Health, MH: home modification and upgrades to retain housing - $1,150,000), is 03 reappropriated to the Department of Health, division of senior and disabilities services, for 04 assessment capacity for individuals with disabilities and seniors for the fiscal years ending 05 June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 06 * Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. The sum 07 of $2,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Labor and 08 Workforce Development for information technology improvements necessary to support the 09 creation of a paid parental leave program. 10 * Sec. 21. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. (a) The proceeds received by the 11 Department of Public Safety during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of 12 state-owned vessels and surplus vessel parts and accessories, estimated to be $150,000, are 13 appropriated to the Department of Public Safety for renewal, replacement, and maintenance of 14 vessels. 15 (b) The proceeds received by the Department of Public Safety during the fiscal year 16 ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of state-owned aircraft and surplus aircraft parts and 17 accessories, estimated to be $150,000, are appropriated to the Department of Public Safety for 18 renewal, replacement, and maintenance of aircraft. 19 * Sec. 22. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. (a) The sum of $250,000 is appropriated from 20 the general fund to the Department of Revenue for necessary updates to the department's tax 21 revenue management system and associated information technology modifications related to 22 the implementation of a state sales tax on electronic smoking products. 23 (b) The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 24 Revenue for necessary updates to the department's tax revenue management system and 25 associated information technology modifications related to the implementation of an 26 alternative volumetric tax on natural gas that originates from the North Slope. 27 (c) The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 28 Revenue for necessary updates to the department's tax revenue management system and 29 associated information technology modifications related to the implementation of tax law 30 changes other than a sales tax on electronic smoking products or an alternative volumetric tax 31 on natural gas that originates from the North Slope. 01 * Sec. 23. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. After 02 the appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act, the amount appropriated to the Alaska capital 03 income fund (AS 37.05.565) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be 04 $2,194,800, is appropriated from the Alaska capital income fund to the Department of 05 Transportation and Public Facilities for statewide critical deferred maintenance, renovation, 06 and repair. 07 * Sec. 24. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. (a) The unexpended and unobligated general 08 fund balances of the following appropriations are reappropriated to the Office of the Governor 09 for capital costs related to facilities repairs and maintenance, information technology 10 improvements and upgrades, food security, elections equipment and security, and resource 11 development analyses and process reviews: 12 (1) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 20, line 7 (Office of the Governor, 13 executive operations - $16,680,900); 14 (2) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 20, line 14 (Office of the Governor, 15 facilities rent - $1,436,800); 16 (3) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 20, line 18 (Office of the Governor, office 17 of management and budget - $3,483,900); 18 (4) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 21, line 5 (Office of the Governor, elections 19 - $6,319,000); and 20 (5) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 21, line 7 (Office of the Governor, 21 commissions/special offices - $2,989,700). 22 (b) It is the intent of the legislature that the Office of the Governor submit a report 23 that details the expenditures from the appropriation made in (a) of this section to the co-chairs 24 of the finance committee of each house of the legislature and the legislative finance division 25 by December 1, 2026, and by December 20 of each subsequent year, until the appropriation is 26 fully expended. 27 * Sec. 25. REAPPROPRIATION OF LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATIONS. (a) The 28 unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, not to exceed $500,000, of the following 29 appropriations are reappropriated to the Alaska Legislature, Legislative Council, for training, 30 outreach, and intergovernmental coordination programs and events for the fiscal years ending 31 June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028: 01 (1) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 45, line 19 (Alaska Legislature, Budget and 02 Audit Committee - $19,812,200); 03 (2) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 45, line 24 (Alaska Legislature, Legislative 04 Council - $33,032,900); 05 (3) sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 46, line 5 (Alaska Legislature, legislative 06 operating budget - $37,944,200); and 07 (4) sec. 2, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 47, lines 10 and 19 - 22 (HB 57, schools: 08 comm. devices/class size/funding, Alaska Legislature, Legislative Council, council and 09 subcommittees - $80,000). 10 (b) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, after the appropriation 11 made in (a) of this section, of the appropriations listed in (a)(1) - (4) of this section are 12 reappropriated to the Alaska Legislature, Legislative Council, council and subcommittees, for 13 renovation and repair of, technology improvements to, and other necessary projects related to 14 legislative buildings and facilities. 15 * Sec. 26. HOUSE DISTRICT 8. Section 4, ch. 8, SLA 2024, page 42, lines 12 - 14, is 16 amended to read: 17 APPROPRIATION GENERAL 18 ITEMS FUND 19 Cooper Landing Emergency Services, 92,748 92,748 20 Inc. - Building Maintenance and 21 Repairs, and Firefighting and 22 Personal Protective Equipment 23 Update and Replacement (HD 8) 24 * Sec. 27. LAPSE. (a) The appropriations made in secs. 1, 4, 7, 10, 11, 13(2), 14, 15(a) - 25 (d), 16 - 18, 19(a), 20 - 23, 24(a), and 25(b) of this Act are for capital projects and lapse under 26 AS 37.25.020. 27 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 13(1) of this Act is for the capitalization of a fund 28 and does not lapse. 29 * Sec. 28. RETROACTIVITY. (a) Sections 15(e) and 29 of this Act are retroactive to 30 December 31, 2025. 31 (b) Sections 10 and 11 of this Act are retroactive to May 20, 2026. 01 (c) Sections 4 - 6, 14, 16, 17, 19, and 24 - 26 of this Act are retroactive to June 30, 02 2026. 03 (d) Sections 1 - 3, 12, 13, 15(a) - (d), 18, 20 - 23, and 27 of this Act are retroactive to 04 July 1, 2026. 05 * Sec. 29. CONTINGENCIES. (a) The appropriations made in secs. 7 - 9 of this Act are 06 contingent on the 2027 fiscal year-to-date average price of Alaska North Slope crude oil being 07 equal to or greater than $80 a barrel on December 31, 2026. 08 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 20 of this Act is contingent on passage by the 09 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature and enactment into law of a version of House Bill 193 10 or a substantially similar bill creating a paid parental leave program. 11 (c) The appropriation made in sec. 22(a) of this Act is contingent on passage by the 12 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature and enactment into law of a version of Senate Bill 24 13 or a substantially similar bill relating to a state sales tax on electronic smoking products. 14 (d) The appropriation made in sec. 22(b) of this Act is contingent on passage by the 15 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature and enactment into law of a version of House Bill 381, 16 Senate Bill 280, or a substantially similar bill relating to an alternative volumetric tax on 17 natural gas that originates from the North Slope. 18 (e) The appropriation made in sec. 22(c) of this Act is contingent on passage by the 19 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature and enactment into law of one or more bills that 20 require the Department of Revenue to modify the department's tax revenue management 21 system to implement tax law changes other than a state sales tax on electronic smoking 22 products or an alternative volumetric tax on natural gas that originates from the North Slope. 23 (f) Section 25(b), ch. 12, SLA 2025, is amended to read: 24 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 11(a), ch. 12, SLA 2025, [OF THIS ACT] 25 is contingent on incorporation of the Xunaa Borough on or before June 30, 2029 26 [DECEMBER 31, 2025]. 27 * Sec. 30. Sections 10, 11, 15(e), 28, and 29 of this Act take effect immediately under 28 AS 01.10.070(c). 29 * Sec. 31. Sections 4 - 6, 14, 16, 17, 19, and 24 - 26 of this Act take effect June 30, 2026. 30 * Sec. 32. Sections 7 - 9 of this Act take effect January 1, 2027. 31 * Sec. 33. Except as provided in secs. 30 - 32 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.